hw2files/spanishstress.foma
# Ling7800 HW2 skeleton

define V [a|e|i|o|u];
define Vaccent [á|é|í|ó|ú];

define C [b|v|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|ñ|p|q|r|t|v|x|y|z];
define Cfull [b|v|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|ñ|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|x|y|z];
define NS [n|s];

# If Weak next to Strong, same syllable
define WeakV [i|u];

# If Strong next to Strong, different syllable
define StrongV [a|e|o];

define TestWords {aceite}|{cierra}|{causa}|{viuda}|{fuimos}|
                 {diluir}|{bombear}|{polea}|{empleo}|
                 {finlandia}|{farmacia}|{indio}|{azafata}|
                 {comen}|{gratis}|{feliz}|{epidemia}|
                 {cantabais}|{bailar}|{peine}|{boina}|
                 {pausa}|{deuda}|{familia}|{bien}|{kiosco}|
                 {ecuador}|{sueco}|{antiguo};

# Read in words from file and create automaton
define CorrectWords @txt"spanishstress-correct.txt" ;

# Put your definition of SpanishStress here

# On the penultimate syllable if the word ends in a vowel, n, or s. (e.g. mesa, andan, casas).
define EndInVNS V -> {*} ||  ?* _ [Cfull+][V+|NS]+.#. ;

# On the final syllable if the words ends in a consonant other than n or s. (e.g. andar, cazar).
define EndInC V -> {*} ||  ?* _ C.#. ;

# One syllable
define OneSyl StrongV -> {*} || Cfull WeakV _ Cfull.#. ;

define SpanishStress EndInC .o. EndInVNS .o. OneSyl;

# You can test how many correct and incorrect predictions you get by
# a little bit of finite-state calculus:
#
# How many predictions are correct:
regex [TestWords .o. SpanishStress].l;

# How many are incorrect:
# regex [TestWords .o. SpanishStress].l - CorrectWords;
